Hawaii statutes.
§435E-33 Compensation. No person shall
receive, or be entitled to receive any payment, bonus, salary, income,
compensation, or other benefit whatsoever, either from the reserve trust fund
or the income therefrom or from any other funds of the interindemnity
arrangement or the members thereof based on the number of participating
members, or the amount of the reserve trust fund or other funds of the
interindemnity arrangement. [L 1977, c 182, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next